Montana, session 2025, SB469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 53-21-1002, MCA, is amended to read:
"53-21-1002. Duties of department. The department:
(1) shall take cognizance of matters affecting the mental health of the citizens of the state;
(2) shall initiate mental health care and treatment, prevention, and research as can best be
accomplished by community-centered services. The department shall initiate and operate services in
cooperation with local agencies, service area authorities, mental health professionals, and other entities
providing services to persons with mental illness.
(3) shall specifically address:
(a) provider contracting;
(b) service planning;
(c) preadmission screening and discharge planning;
(d) quality management;
(e) utilization management and review;
(f) consumer and family education; and
(g) rights protection;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 469

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 469.1
(4) shall collect and disseminate information relating to mental health;
(5) shall prepare and maintain a comprehensive plan to develop public mental health services in
the state and to establish service areas;
(6) must receive from agencies of the United States and other state agencies, persons or groups
of persons, associations, firms, or corporations grants of money, receipts from fees, gifts, supplies, materials,
and contributions for the development of mental health services within the state;
(7) shall establish qualified provider certification standards by rule, which may include
requirements for national accreditation for mental health programs that receive funds from the department;
(8) shall perform an annual review and evaluation of mental health needs and services within the
state by region and evaluate the performance of programs that receive funds from the department for
compliance with federal and state standards;
(9) shall support each county and tribal nation in developing and maintaining a local mental health
advisory council;
(9) (10) shall coordinate state and community resources to ensure comprehensive delivery of services
to children with emotional disturbances, as provided in Title 52, chapter 2, part 3; and
(11) shall receive recommendations or requests from service area authorities, as provided in 53-21-
1006, and respond within 10 days;
(12) shall provide one liaison from the division of the department that oversees children's mental
health and one liaison from the division of the department that oversees child and family services;
(13) shall provide an annual contract to each service area authority, as provided in 53-21-1006, that
funds an administrative assistant, a website, monthly meeting expenses, an annual conference, mini grants,
licensed addiction counselor support, community events, prevention, crisis support services, strategic planning,
and other services; and
(10) (14) shall coordinate and provide staff and financial support to facilitate the establishment of
a minimum of three service area authorities, as provided in 53-21-1006, to collaborate with the department in
the planning and oversight of mental health services in a service area, including:
(a) a minimum of three full-time equivalent community program officer positions;
(b) administrative assistance to each service area authority board; and
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 469

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 469.1
(c) technical assistance to understand the requirements of this part and state contracts."

Section 2. Section 53-21-1006, MCA, is amended to read:
"53-21-1006. Service area authorities -- leadership committees -- boards -- plans. (1) In the
development of a service area authority, public meetings must be held in communities throughout a service
area as defined by the department by rule. The purpose of the meetings is to assist the department to establish
a stakeholder leadership committee in collaboration with service area community members affected by mental
illness. The meetings must be designed to solicit input from consumers of services for persons with mental
illness, advocates, family members of persons with mental illness, mental health professionals, county
commissioners, county and tribal advisory councils, and other interested community members.
(2) The leadership committee within each service area must include but is not limited to a
significant portion of consumers of services for persons with mental illness, family members of persons with
mental illness, and a mental health services provider. The department shall provide assistance for the ongoing
development of a leadership committee, including strengthening the diversity of the committee. The department
shall approve a leadership committee within each service area.
(3) The leadership committee within each service area shall establish a service area authority
board and create bylaws that describe the board's functions and method of appointment. The bylaws must be
submitted to the department for review. The majority of the members of the board must be consumers of mental
health services and family members of consumers.
(4) The service area authority board must be established under Title 35, chapter 2. Nonprofit
corporations incorporated for the purposes of this part may not be considered agencies of the department or
the state of Montana.
(5) A service area authority board:
(a) shall collaborate with the department for purposes of planning and oversight of mental health
services of the service area, including:
(i) provider contracting;
(ii) quality and outcome management;
(iii) service planning;
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 469

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 469.1
(iv) utilization management and review;
(v) preadmission screening and discharge planning;
(vi) consumer advocacy and family education and rights protection;
(vii) infrastructure;
(viii) information requirements; and
(ix) procurement processes;
(b) shall review and monitor crisis intervention programs established pursuant to 53-21-1202;
(c) shall submit a biennial review and evaluation of mental health service needs and services
within the service area;
(d) shall keep all records of the board and make reports required by the department;
(e) may enter into contracts with the department for purposes of planning and oversight of the
service area if the department certifies that the service area authority is capable of assuming the duty;
(f) may receive and shall administer funding available for the provision of mental health services,
including grants from the United States government and other agencies, receipts for established fees rendered,
taxes, gifts, donations, and other types of support or income. All funds received by the board must be used to
carry out the purposes of this part.
(g) may reimburse board members for actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending
meetings and in the discharge of board duties as assigned by the board;
(h) shall either include a county commissioner or work closely with county commissioners in the
service area; and
(i) has the authority to:
(i) collaborate with the department, the Montana state hospital, the board of visitors, and the
mental health ombudsman;
(ii) participate in behavioral health site visits;
(iii) review and respond to complaints; and
(iv) provide written recommendations to the department; and
(i) (j) shall take into consideration the policies, plans, and budget developed by the children's system
of care planning committee provided for in 52-2-303.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 469

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 469.1
(6) A service area authority may not directly provide mental health services.
(7) A service area authority shall provide an annual report to the governor, department, and the
legislature, in accordance with 5-11-210, that includes:
(a) a budget and treasurer's report and its annual distribution of funds;
(b) recommendations to the state, including any recommendations submitted to the department
and any response from the department; and
(c) a constrictive survey from each local advisory council and service area authority detailing the
relationship between the state, the local advisory council, and the service area authority for the purpose of
improving and maintaining this part."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Unfunded mandate laws superseded. The provisions of [this act]
expressly supersede and modify the requirements of 1-2-112 through 1-2-116.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 469